Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 4 Witnesses; Settlement Agreement; Expenses

53-5-23.
Methods of examining witnesses; photocopy of will.

In all proceedings for the probate of a will in common form or solemn form, witnesses to the will may be examined in person or by written interrogatories which shall be answered in writing and under oath before a notary public or by depositions or other discovery procedures under the same circumstances as other civil cases. The probate court shall have the power to compel the attendance of witnesses in the same manner as the superior court.

Where witnesses are to be examined as authorized by this Code section, a photocopy of the will may be exhibited to the witnesses in lieu of the original will. The testimony of a witness to whom a photocopy of a will has been exhibited shall be given the same weight as though the original will had been exhibited to the witness.

The provisions of this Code section shall not be construed as repealing any other statutory provision prescribing a method or procedure for the taking of testimony by interrogatories or depositions, but as supplementary of such other provisions and cumulative to such other provisions and as providing additional means or methods of taking the testimony of subscribing witnesses to a will in proceedings for the probate of the will. The taking or procuring of testimony in the manner prescribed by this Code section shall be sufficient for all purposes of the probate proceedings, notwithstanding any other statute.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Interrogatories generally, §

9-11-33

.

53-5-24.
Unavailability of subscribing witnesses.

When it appears that a will cannot be proved as otherwise provided by law because at the time the will is offered for probate one or more of the subscribing witnesses to the will is dead or mentally or physically incapable of testifying or otherwise inaccessible, the court may admit the will to probate in common or solemn form upon the testimony in person or by affidavit or by deposition of at least two credible disinterested witnesses that the signature to the will is that of the individual whose will it purports to be or upon other sufficient proof of such signature. This Code section shall not preclude the court, in its discretion, from requiring, in addition, the testimony in person or by deposition of any available subscribing witness or proof of such other pertinent facts and circumstances as the court may deem necessary to admit the will to probate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-25.
Settlement agreement.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Court” means a probate court or any superior court on appeal or transfer from a probate court.

“Interested persons” means all persons whose interests would be affected by the approval of a settlement agreement in the manner provided in this Code section.

The court may approve a settlement agreement under which probate is granted or denied or providing for a disposition of the property contrary to the terms of the will, if all interested persons consent and any duly qualified personal representative or temporary administrator is served with notice of the petition to approve such settlement agreement.

A proceeding to approve a settlement agreement under this Code section may be commenced by an interested person or by any duly qualified personal representative or temporary administrator. Service of notice of a petition to approve a settlement agreement under this Code section shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title to all the interested persons, any duly qualified personal representative or temporary administrator, and such other persons as the court may direct.

Approval of any settlement agreement that provides for the probate of the will, the sustaining of the caveat, or the disposition of the property contrary to the terms of the will shall be after such additional service of notice and such hearing as the court may direct in the exercise of its sound discretion. At any such hearing, the court may require or receive such evidence as the court may deem appropriate and may determine whether there is a bona fide contest or controversy.

All interested persons who are sui juris shall be authorized to enter into a settlement agreement, which shall be assented to in writing by all such interested persons.

All interested persons who are not sui juris or who are unborn or unknown shall be represented in such proceedings by an independent guardian ad litem. It shall be the duty of the guardian ad litem to investigate the proposed settlement and report to the court such guardian’s findings and recommendations. The court shall take the recommendations into consideration but shall not be bound by such recommendations; provided, however, that, for purposes of subsection (b) of this Code section, the guardian ad litem’s recommendation that the court approve the settlement agreement shall constitute consent to the settlement agreement by the guardian ad litem on behalf of all interested persons represented by such guardian.

If a trust designated in the will to take an interest in real or personal property would have such interest affected by the settlement agreement:

The provisions of such agreement affecting such interest shall satisfy the requirements of Code Section 53-12-9 in order to be binding on the trust, the trustee, any trust director, and the trust beneficiaries; and

A probate court not subject to Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15, upon its own motion or upon the motion of any interested person or duly qualified personal representative or temporary administrator, shall enter an order transferring the proceeding to approve the settlement agreement to the superior court to which an appeal would lie under Code Section 5-3-2.

A judgment entered by the court approving the settlement agreement shall be conclusive in the same manner as probate in solemn form, as provided by Code Section 53-5-20.

Entering into or petitioning a court regarding a settlement agreement under this Code section shall not constitute a violation of a condition in terrorem under Code Section 53-4-68.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-24/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote this Code section, which formerly read: “(a)
Upon petition of the interested parties, any superior court on appeal or any probate court which is so authorized by Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15 may approve a settlement agreement under which probate is granted or denied, providing for a disposition of the property contrary to the terms of the will. Approval of any settlement agreement that provides for the sustaining of the caveat or the disposition of the property contrary to the terms of the will shall be after a hearing, notice of which shall be given as the court may direct, at which evidence is introduced and at which the court finds as a matter of fact that there is a bona fide contest or controversy.

“(b) All individuals who are sui juris and affected by such a settlement agreement shall be authorized to enter into such an agreement which shall be assented to in writing by all the heirs of the testator and by all sui juris beneficiaries affected by such a settlement.

“(c) All individuals who are not sui juris, or are unborn beneficiaries, heirs, or persons unknown shall be represented in such proceedings by an independent guardian ad litem. It shall be the duty of the guardian ad litem to investigate the proposed settlement and report to the court the guardian’s findings and recommendations. The court shall take the recommendations into consideration but shall not be bound by such recommendations.

“(d) A judgment entered in the court and based upon the settlement agreement shall be binding on all parties including individuals not sui juris, unborn beneficiaries or heirs, and persons unknown who are represented before the court by the guardian ad litem appointed for that purpose.”

Cross references.

Guardians ad litem and appraisers for year’s support in probate court proceedings, Uniform Rules for the Probate Courts, Rule 23.

Law reviews.

For article discussing methods of summary distribution and settlement of decedent’s estate, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

For article discussing possibility of compromise settlement between the heirs and devisees as disincentive for unfair distribution of will, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-5-26.
Persons entitled to recover expenses.

Upon petition to the probate court, a person named as an executor in a purported will of a decedent shall be entitled to recover from the estate of the decedent the expenses incurred in offering the will for probate in common or solemn form, including reasonable attorney’s fees, provided the person proceeded in good faith. The probate court shall determine whether the person proceeded in good faith and the amount of the expenses. The order of the probate court shall be subject to appeal as is provided in other cases.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-27.
Nonjudicial settlement agreement.

As used in this Code section, the term “court” means a probate court or superior court on appeal or transfer from a probate court.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the personal representative nominated in the will or duly qualified so to serve and all persons whose interests would be affected may enter into a binding nonjudicial settlement agreement with respect to any matter involving a will.

A nonjudicial settlement agreement shall be valid only to the extent it does not violate a material intention of the testator under Article 6 of Chapter 4 of this title and includes terms and conditions that properly could be approved by the court under Code Section 53-5-25 or other applicable law.

A nonjudicial settlement agreement entered into in accordance with this Code section shall be final and binding on all parties to such agreement, including individuals not sui juris, unborn individuals, and persons unknown who are represented by a guardian who may represent and bind such parties under Code Section 53-5-25 or 53-11-2, as if ordered by a court with competent jurisdiction over the will, the estate of the decedent, and the parties.

Any person bound by a nonjudicial settlement agreement under subsection (c) of this Code section may request that the court approve such agreement, determine whether the representation provided under Code Section 53-5-25 or 53-11-2 was adequate, determine whether such agreement violates a material intention of the testator under Article 6 of Chapter 4 of this title, determine whether such agreement contains terms and conditions the court properly could have approved, or make any other similar determination.

If a trust designated in the will to take an interest in real or personal property would have such interest affected by the nonjudicial settlement agreement:

The provisions of such agreement affecting such interest shall satisfy the requirements of Code Section 53-12-9 in order to be binding on the trust, the trustee, any trust director, and the trust beneficiaries; and

A probate court not subject to Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15, upon the request of any person bound by a nonjudicial settlement agreement that the court determine whether such agreement contains terms and conditions the court properly could have approved, shall enter an order transferring the proceeding to the superior court to which an appeal would lie under Code Section 5-3-2 for the determination of all questions under subsection (d) of this Code section.

Entering into or petitioning a court regarding a nonjudicial settlement agreement under this Code section shall not constitute a violation of a condition in terrorem under Code Section 53-4-68.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-25/HB 865.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).